Indiana, session 2026, SB264.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-3.1-13-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.4-2005,
SECTION 67, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) As used in this chapter, "credit amount"
means the amount agreed to between the corporation and applicant
under this chapter, but not to exceed, in the case of a credit awarded for
a project to create new jobs in Indiana, the incremental income tax
withholdings attributable to the applicant's project.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), in the case of a credit
awarded for a project to create new jobs in Indiana that are filled
by a full-time employee, as defined in section 4 of this chapter, who
is a new resident of Indiana, as determined by the corporation, the
credit amount means the amount agreed to between the
corporation and applicant under this chapter not to exceed ten
thousand dollars ($10,000).
SECTION 2. IC 6-3.1-13-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.74-2020,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) The corporation may make credit awards
2026 IN 264—LS 7096/DI 120


under this chapter for any of the following:
(1) To foster job creation in Indiana.
(2) To foster job retention in Indiana.
(3) To foster job and employee retention in Indiana through
the increase of wages paid to existing full-time employees.
(b) The credit shall be claimed for the taxable years specified in the
taxpayer's tax credit agreement.
SECTION 3. IC 6-3.1-13-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.74-2020,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) A person that proposes a project to create
new jobs in Indiana may apply, as provided in section 15 of this
chapter, to the corporation to enter into an agreement for a tax credit
under this chapter.
(b) A person that proposes to retain existing jobs in Indiana may
apply, as provided in section 15.5 of this chapter, to the corporation to
enter into an agreement for a tax credit under this chapter.
(c) A person that proposes to retain existing jobs and employees
in Indiana by increasing wages paid to existing full-time employees
may apply, as provided in section 15.6 of this chapter, to the
corporation to enter into an agreement for a tax credit under this
chapter.
(c) (d) The corporation shall prescribe the form of the application.
SECTION 4. IC 6-3.1-13-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.197-2005,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) This section subsection applies to an
application proposing a project to create new jobs in Indiana. After
receipt of an application, the corporation may enter into an agreement
with the applicant for a credit under this chapter if the corporation
determines that all of the following conditions exist:
(1) The applicant's project will create new jobs that were not jobs
previously performed by employees of the applicant in Indiana.
(2) The applicant's project is economically sound and will benefit
the people of Indiana by increasing opportunities for employment
in Indiana and strengthening the economy of Indiana.
(3) Receiving the tax credit is a major factor in the applicant's
decision to go forward with the project and not receiving the tax
credit will result in the applicant not creating new jobs in Indiana.
(4) Awarding the tax credit will result in an overall positive fiscal
impact to the state, as certified by the budget agency using the
best available data.
(5) The credit is not prohibited by section 16 of this chapter.
(6) If the business is located in a community revitalization
2026 IN 264—LS 7096/DI 120


enhancement district established under IC 36-7-13 or a certified
technology park established under IC 36-7-32, the legislative
body of the political subdivision establishing the district or park
has adopted an ordinance recommending the granting of a credit
amount that is at least equal to the credit amount provided in the
agreement.
(b) This subsection applies to an application proposing to create
new jobs in Indiana that may be filled by an individual who is a
new resident of Indiana, as determined by the corporation. In
addition to the conditions contained in subsection (a), the
corporation may enter into an agreement with the applicant for a
credit under this chapter that may exceed the incremental income
tax withholdings attributable to the applicant's project if the
corporation determines that all of the following conditions exist:
(1) The new jobs created by the applicant's project may be
filled by individuals who, prior to their employment at the
project location, were not residents of Indiana.
(2) The applicant's project is engaging in research and
development, manufacturing, or business services, according
to the NAICS Manual of the United States Office of
Management and Budget.
(3) The applicant will implement or maintain a program that
facilitates the relocation of individuals to Indiana for the
purpose of employment by the applicant at the project
location through payments to reimburse the individual, or
that are paid directly to third parties on behalf of the
individual, that include:
(A) moving costs;
(B) relocation bonuses;
(C) housing assistance;
(D) storage fees;
(E) home sale or purchase assistance; or
(F) other applicable expenses associated with relocating
individuals to Indiana that are approved by the
corporation.
(4) The average compensation (including benefits) provided
to the applicant's new employees exceeds two hundred percent
(200%) of the state average wage.
SECTION 5. IC 6-3.1-13-15.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15.6. This section applies to an
application proposing to retain existing jobs and employees in
2026 IN 264—LS 7096/DI 120


Indiana through the increase of wages paid to existing Indiana
resident full-time employees. After receipt of an application, the
corporation may enter into an agreement with the applicant for a
credit under this chapter if the corporation determines that all of
the following conditions exist:
(1) The conditions in section 15.5(1) through 15.5(5) of this
chapter, section 15.5(7) through 15.5(8) of this chapter, and
section 15.5(10) of this chapter are satisfied.
(2) Receiving the tax credit is a major factor in the applicant's
decision to increase the wages of existing employees at the
project location by at least twenty-five percent (25%).
(3) Awarding the tax credit will reduce the potential:
(A) loss of employees; and
(B) of the applicant either:
(i) reducing jobs in Indiana, or
(ii) maintaining job vacancies because of the loss of
employees in Indiana.
SECTION 6. IC 6-3.1-13-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.135-2022,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) If the applicant proposes a project that will
be located at a physical location in Indiana, in determining the credit
amount that should be awarded to an applicant under section 15 of this
chapter that proposes a project to create jobs in Indiana, the corporation
may take into consideration the following factors:
(1) The economy of the county where the projected investment is
to occur.
(2) The potential impact on the economy of Indiana.
(3) The incremental payroll attributable to the project.
(4) The capital investment attributable to the project.
(5) The amount the average wage paid by the applicant exceeds
the average wage paid:
(A) within the county in which the project will be located, in
the case of an application submitted before January 1, 2006; or
(B) in the case of an application submitted after December 31,
2005:
(i) to all employees working in the same NAICS industry
sector to which the applicant's business belongs in the
county in which the applicant's business is located, if there
is more than one (1) business in that NAICS industry sector
in the county in which the applicant's business is located;
(ii) to all employees working in the same NAICS industry
sector to which the applicant's business belongs in Indiana,
2026 IN 264—LS 7096/DI 120


if the applicant's business is the only business in that NAICS
industry sector in the county in which the applicant's
business is located but there is more than one (1) business in
that NAICS industry sector in Indiana; or
(iii) to all employees working in the same county as the
county in which the applicant's business is located, if there
is no other business in Indiana in the same NAICS industry
sector to which the applicant's business belongs.
(6) The costs to Indiana and the affected political subdivisions
with respect to the project.
(7) The financial assistance and incentives that are otherwise
provided by Indiana and the affected political subdivisions.
(8) The extent to which the incremental income tax withholdings
attributable to the applicant's project are needed for the purposes
of an incremental tax financing fund or industrial development
fund under IC 36-7-13 or a certified technology park fund under
IC 36-7-32.
As appropriate, the corporation shall consider the factors in this
subsection to determine the credit amount awarded to an applicant for
a project to retain existing jobs in Indiana under section 15.5 of this
chapter or to retain existing employees and their jobs in Indiana
under section 15.6 of this chapter.
(b) Subject to the limitations of subsection (c), if an applicant
proposes a project that proposes to create new jobs in Indiana but does
not propose a physical location in Indiana, the corporation may
consider the following factors:
(1) The potential impact on the economy in Indiana.
(2) The incremental payroll attributable to the project.
(3) The amount of average wage paid by the applicant that
exceeds the average wage paid to all employees working in the
same NAICS industry sector to which the applicant's business
belongs in Indiana.
(4) The cost to Indiana with respect to the project.
(5) The financial assistance and incentives that are otherwise
provided by Indiana.
(6) The extent of Indiana income tax that is paid by eligible
employees.
(c) An applicant proposing a project that meets the requirements of
subsection (b) must propose:
(1) to create at least fifty (50) new full-time jobs; and
(2) to pay an average hourly wage of at least one hundred fifty
percent (150%) of the state average wage;
2026 IN 264—LS 7096/DI 120


in order to be eligible to receive a credit under this chapter.
SECTION 7. IC 6-3.1-13-18, AS AMENDED BY P.L.135-2022,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 18. (a) The corporation shall determine the
amount and duration of a tax credit awarded under this chapter. The
duration of the credit may not exceed twenty (20) taxable years. The
credit may be stated as a percentage of the incremental income tax
withholdings attributable to the applicant's project and may include a
fixed dollar limitation. Except as otherwise provided in section 2(b)
of this chapter, in the case of a credit awarded for a project to create
new jobs in Indiana, the credit amount may not exceed the incremental
income tax withholdings. However, the credit amount claimed for a
taxable year may exceed the taxpayer's state tax liability for the taxable
year, in which case the excess may, at the discretion of the corporation,
be refunded to the taxpayer.
(b) This subsection does not apply to a business that was enrolled
and participated in the E-Verify program (as defined in IC 22-5-1.7-3)
during the time the taxpayer conducted business in Indiana in the
taxable year. A credit under this chapter may not be computed on any
amount withheld from an individual or paid to an individual for
services provided in Indiana as an employee, if the individual was,
during the period of service, prohibited from being hired as an
employee under 8 U.S.C. 1324a.
2026 IN 264—LS 7096/DI 120